Utah statutes.
41-12a-806.   Restricted Account -- Creation -- Funding -- Interest --
Purposes.
(1)  There is created within the Transportation Fund a restricted account
known as the "Uninsured Motorist Identification Restricted Account."
(2)  The account consists of monies generated from the following revenue
sources:
(a)  monies received by the state under Section 41-1a-1218, the uninsured
motorist identification fee;
(b) monies received by the state under Section 41-1a-1220; and
(c)  appropriations made to the account by the Legislature.
(3) (a)  The account shall earn interest.
(b)  All interest earned on account monies shall be deposited into the
account.
(4)  Monies shall be appropriated from the account by the Legislature to:
(a)  the department to fund the contract with the designated agent;
(b)  the department to offset the costs to state and local law enforcement
agencies of using the information for the purposes authorized under this part;
and
(c)  the Tax Commission to offset the costs to the Motor Vehicle Division for
revoking and reinstating vehicle registrations under Subsection
41-1a-110(2)(a)(ii).
